apertium-cat-cos.cos.dix
    <pardef n="/esce__vblex">
      <e><p><l>esce</l><r>esce<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>escu</l><r>esce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>esci</l><r>esce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>esce</l><r>esce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iscemu</l><r>esce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iscite</l><r>esce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>escenu</l><r>esce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>esca</l><r>esce<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>esca</l><r>esce<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>esca</l><r>esce<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iscamu</l><r>esce<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iscate</l><r>esce<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>escanu</l><r>esce<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>sciutu</l><r>esce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sciuta</l><r>esce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sciuti</l><r>esce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sciute</l><r>esce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="/andà__vblex">
      <e><p><l>andà</l><r>andà<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vacu</l><r>andà<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vai</l><r>andà<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>va</l><r>andà<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>andemu</l><r>andà<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>andate</l><r>andà<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vanu</l><r>andà<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>andatu</l><r>andà<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>andata</l><r>andà<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>andati</l><r>andà<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>andate</l><r>andà<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="f/à__vblex">
      <e><p><l>à</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>acciu</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aci</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ace</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>emu</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ate</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>acenu</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>attu</l><r>andà<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>atta</l><r>andà<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>atti</l><r>andà<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>atte</l><r>andà<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="d/à__vblex">
      <e><p><l>à</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ò</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ai</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>à</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>emu</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ate</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>anu</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="piac/e__vblex">
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>enu</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="m/ette__vblex">
      <e><p><l>ette</l><r>ette<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ettu</l><r>ette<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>etti</l><r>ette<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ette</l><r>ette<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ittemu</l><r>ette<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ittite</l><r>ette<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ettenu</l><r>ette<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>etti</l><r>ette<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>etti</l><r>ette<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>etti</l><r>ette<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ettimu</l><r>ette<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ettite</l><r>ette<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ettinu</l><r>ette<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>


      <e><p><l>essu</l><r>ette<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>essa</l><r>ette<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>essi</l><r>ette<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>esse</l><r>ette<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="t/uccà__vblex">
      <e><p><l>uccà</l><r>uccà<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>occa</l><r>uccà<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>occu</l><r>uccà<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>occa</l><r>uccà<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>occi</l><r>uccà<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>occe</l><r>uccà<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="fid/ià__vblex">
      <e><p><l>ià</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>èndu</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eghju</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eghji</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eghja</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iemu</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iate</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eghjanu</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

    <e lm="andà"><i></i><par n="/andà__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fà"><i>f</i><par n="f/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dà"><i>d</i><par n="d/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="stà"><i>st</i><par n="d/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fidià"><i>fid</i><par n="fid/ià__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tuccà"><i>t</i><par n="t/uccà__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="piace"><i>piac</i><par n="piac/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mette"><i>m</i><par n="m/ette__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="esce"><i></i><par n="/esce__vblex"/></e>
